Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-211
Sales territory, defined.

Sales territory shall mean an area of exclusive sales responsibility for the brand or brands and quality thereof granted to a wholesaler by a supplier as designated in an agreement between them.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 11.